Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-243
Unsolicited advertisement, defined.

Unsolicited advertisement means any material advertising the commercial availability or quality of any property, goods, or services which is transmitted to any person without that person's prior express invitation or permission.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1207;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 105.